Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1445.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 44SCHOOL-BASED SERVICESSec.4401. Legislative findings and intent.4402. Definitions.4403. Insurance coverage for health care service in school setting.4404. Permitted exclusions.4405. Coordination of benefits.4406. Construction.123456789101112131415161718 4407. Regulations.4408. Penalties.4409. Administrative procedures.§ 4401. Legislative findings and intent.(a) Legislative findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Health care services, including mental health services, may be available to students in a school setting.(2) Educational opportunities for students will be maximized if students are able to access health care services without leaving their school setting.(b) Intent.--The intent of this chapter is to maximize educational opportunities for students by establishing limitations on when health insurance coverage for health care services provided in a school setting may be excluded or denied.§ 4402. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Administrative policy." A written document or collection of documents reflecting the terms of the contractual or operating relationship between an insurer and a health care provider."Clinical review criteria." The set of written screening procedures, decision abstracts, clinical protocols and practice guidelines used by an insurer to determine the necessity and appropriateness of health care services."Commissioner." The Insurance Commissioner of the Commonwealth."Covered person." A policyholder, subscriber or other individual who is entitled to receive health care services under 20250HB1445PN1897 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a health insurance policy."Habilitative speech therapy." Speech therapy that helps an individual to keep, learn or improve skills and function for daily living."Health care provider." A person that is licensed, certified, registered or otherwise permitted by law or regulation to provide health care services under the laws of this Commonwealth."Health care service." A treatment, procedure, medical supply or other service prescribed or otherwise provided or proposed to be provided by a health care provider to a covered person for any of the following:(1) mental health;(2) behavioral health; or(3) speech therapy."Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage.(2) The term does not include:(i) An accident only policy.(ii) A credit only policy.(iii) A long-term care or disability income policy.(iv) A specified disease policy.(v) A Medicare supplement policy.(vi) A policy under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents, including a Tricare policy or a Civilian Health And Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.20250HB1445PN1897 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) A fixed indemnity policy.(viii) A hospital indemnity policy.(ix) A dental only policy.(x) A vision only policy.(xi) A workers' compensation policy.(xii) An automobile medical payment policy under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles).(xiii) A homeowner's insurance policy.(xiv) Any other similar policies providing for limited benefits."Insurer." An entity licensed by the department that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV thereof.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) Chapter 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Medical policy." A written document adopted, maintained and applied by an insurer that combines the clinical review criteria and any additional administrative policy, as applicable, necessary to articulate the insurer's standards for coverage of a given health care service or set of health care services under the terms of a health insurance policy."Participating network provider." A health care provider that has entered into a contractual or operating relationship with an insurer to participate in one or more designated 20250HB1445PN1897 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 networks of the insurer and to provide health care services to covered persons under the terms of the insurer's administrative policy."Rehabilitative speech therapy." Speech therapy that helps an individual restore or improve skills and functioning for daily living that have been lost or impaired."School entity." As follows:(1) A public school, including a charter school or cyber charter school, private school, nonpublic school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.(2) The term does not include a postsecondary educational institution."School entity facility." A school entity building, whether permanent or temporary, including a mobile unit."Speech therapy." Therapeutic care provided to an individual for treatment administered by a licensed speech-language pathologist. The term includes both habilitative speech therapy and rehabilitative speech therapy.§ 4403. Insurance coverage for health care service in school setting.(a) Prohibition.--A health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth may not exclude coverage for a medically necessary health care service because the health care service is provided in a school setting, whether through an explicit school setting exclusion or a general place of service exclusion.(b) School setting.--A health care service is provided in a school setting if it is provided in a school entity facility by a health care provider that is:(1) an employee of the school entity;20250HB1445PN1897 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) a contractor of the school entity; or(3) otherwise authorized by the school entity to provide the health care service in the school entity facility.§ 4404. Permitted exclusions.Notwithstanding section 4403, an insurer may exclude coverage for a health care service provided to a covered person in a school setting for any of the following reasons:(1) The health care service is provided by an individual who:(i) is not a health care provider; or(ii) is practicing outside of the individual's scope of practice.(2) The health care service is not medically necessary under the terms of the insurer's medical policies.(3) The provision of the health care service does not comply with the insurer's administrative policies.(4) A school entity or government entity, as defined in 2 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions), is obligated under Federal or State law to provide the health care service in accordance with an individualized education program or section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-122, 29 U.S.C. § 794).§ 4405. Coordination of benefits.(a) Coordination.--Consistent with Federal or State law and upon consent of the parent or guardian, if a covered person has an individualized education program or a section 504 plan, an insurer may coordinate a medically necessary health care service provided in a school setting with any service included in an individualized education program or section 504 plan.(b) Claim.--A health care provider may not submit a claim to 20250HB1445PN1897 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an insurer for a health care service that is provided to a covered person as part of an individualized education program or a section 504 plan.(c) Costs and reimbursements.--A school entity may not shift costs onto or otherwise seek reimbursement from an insurer for health care services that a school entity is required to provide as part of free appropriate public education under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (Public Law 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.).§ 4406. Construction.This chapter may not be construed to limit the application of a health insurance policy's terms and conditions, including:(1) Prohibiting an insurer from paying or reimbursing health care providers for other covered health care services provided in a school setting.(2) Prohibiting an insurer from imposing cost-sharing that is consistent with the terms and conditions of the health insurance policy.(3) Requiring an insurer to cover a health care service provided in a school setting by an out-of-network provider unless otherwise required by network adequacy standards.(4) Requiring an insurer to pay or reimburse a participating network provider if the provision of the health care service in a school setting would be inconsistent with the standard of care.(5) Requiring an insurer to pay or reimburse a health care provider for a health care service for which the health care provider receives or is entitled to receive compensation from a school entity as part of an employment arrangement or contract.20250HB1445PN1897 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 4407. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.§ 4408. Penalties.(a) Authority of commissioner.--Subject to subsection (b), upon satisfactory evidence of a violation of this chapter by an insurer, the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, pursue any of the following courses of action:(1) Suspend, revoke or refuse to renew the license of the offending person.(2) Enter a cease and desist order.(3) Impose a civil penalty of not more than $5,000 for each action in violation of this chapter.(4) Impose a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for each action in willful violation of this chapter.(b) Limitation.--Penalties imposed against an insurer under this section may not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(c) Nonexclusive remedies.--(1) The enforcement remedies imposed under this chapter are in addition to any other remedies or penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable law of this Commonwealth, including the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(2) A violation of this chapter by an insurer shall be deemed to be an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.§ 4409. Administrative procedures.(a) Procedures generally.--The administrative provisions of 20250HB1445PN1897 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this chapter shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies).(b) Appeals.--A party against whom penalties are assessed in an administrative action may appeal to Commonwealth Court as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 2. Section 4803(a)(1) of Title 40, added July 3, 2024 (P.L.516, No.42), is amended and subsection (c) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 4803. Insurance coverage of telemedicine.(a) General rule.--(1) A health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth shall provide coverage for medically necessary health care services provided through telemedicine and delivered by a participating network provider who provides a covered health care service through telemedicine consistent with the insurer's medical policies. A health insurance policy may not exclude a health care service from coverage solely because the health care service is provided through telemedicine, whether explicitly or through a place of service exclusion.* * *(c) Construction.--This section may not be construed to:* * *(4) Require an insurer to pay or reimburse for a health care service that is required by Federal or State law to be provided by a school entity, including a health care service provided in accordance with an individualized education program or section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-122, 29 U.S.C. § 794).20250HB1445PN1897 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1445PN1897 - 10 - 123456789101112